extras/dictionaries/la.aff
SFX A Y 628
SFX A o       o               o         
SFX A o       oque            o         
SFX A o       one             o         
SFX A o       ove             o         
SFX A o       as              o         
SFX A o       asque           o         
SFX A o       asne            o         
SFX A o       asve            o         
SFX A o       at              o         
SFX A o       atque           o         
SFX A o       atne            o         
SFX A o       atve            o         
SFX A o       amus            o         
SFX A o       amusque         o         
SFX A o       amusne          o         
SFX A o       amusve          o         
SFX A o       atis            o         
SFX A o       atisque         o         
SFX A o       atisne          o         
SFX A o       atisve          o         
SFX A o       ant             o         
SFX A o       antque          o         
SFX A o       antne           o         
SFX A o       antve           o         
SFX A o       abam            o         
SFX A o       abamque         o         
SFX A o       abamne          o         
SFX A o       abamve          o         
SFX A o       abas            o         
SFX A o       abasque         o         
SFX A o       abasne          o         
SFX A o       abasve          o         
SFX A o       abat            o         
SFX A o       abatque         o         
SFX A o       abatne          o         
SFX A o       abatve          o         
SFX A o       abamus          o         
SFX A o       abamusque       o         
SFX A o       abamusne        o         
SFX A o       abamusve        o         
SFX A o       abatis          o         
SFX A o       abatisque       o         
SFX A o       abatisne        o         
SFX A o       abatisve        o         
SFX A o       abant           o         
SFX A o       abantque        o         
SFX A o       abantne         o         
SFX A o       abantve         o         
SFX A o       abo             o         
SFX A o       aboque          o         
SFX A o       abone           o         
SFX A o       above           o         
SFX A o       abis            o         
SFX A o       abisque         o         
SFX A o       abisne          o         
SFX A o       abisve          o         
SFX A o       abit            o         
SFX A o       abitque         o         
SFX A o       abitne          o         
SFX A o       abitve          o         
SFX A o       abimus          o         
SFX A o       abimusque       o         
SFX A o       abimusne        o         
SFX A o       abimusve        o         
SFX A o       abitis          o         
SFX A o       abitisque       o         
SFX A o       abitisne        o         
SFX A o       abitisve        o         
SFX A o       abunt           o         
SFX A o       abuntque        o         
SFX A o       abuntne         o         
SFX A o       abuntve         o         
SFX A o       em              o         
SFX A o       emque           o         
SFX A o       emne            o         
SFX A o       emve            o         
SFX A o       es              o         
SFX A o       esque           o         
SFX A o       esne            o         
SFX A o       esve            o         
SFX A o       et              o         
SFX A o       etque           o         
SFX A o       etne            o         
SFX A o       etve            o         
SFX A o       emus            o         
SFX A o       emusque         o         
SFX A o       emusne          o         
SFX A o       emusve          o         
SFX A o       etis            o         
SFX A o       etisque         o         
SFX A o       etisne          o         
SFX A o       etisve          o         
SFX A o       ent             o         
SFX A o       entque          o         
SFX A o       entne           o         
SFX A o       entve           o         
SFX A o       arem            o         
SFX A o       aremque         o         
SFX A o       aremne          o         
SFX A o       aremve          o         
SFX A o       ares            o         
SFX A o       aresque         o         
SFX A o       aresne          o         
SFX A o       aresve          o         
SFX A o       aret            o         
SFX A o       aretque         o         
SFX A o       aretne          o         
SFX A o       aretve          o         
SFX A o       aremus          o         
SFX A o       aremusque       o         
SFX A o       aremusne        o         
SFX A o       aremusve        o         
SFX A o       aretis          o         
SFX A o       aretisque       o         
SFX A o       aretisne        o         
SFX A o       aretisve        o         
SFX A o       arent           o         
SFX A o       arentque        o         
SFX A o       arentne         o         
SFX A o       arentve         o         
SFX A o       a               o         
SFX A o       aque            o         
SFX A o       ane             o         
SFX A o       ave             o         
SFX A o       ate             o         
SFX A o       ateque          o         
SFX A o       atene           o         
SFX A o       ateve           o         
SFX A o       ato             o         
SFX A o       atoque          o         
SFX A o       atone           o         
SFX A o       atove           o         
SFX A o       atote           o         
SFX A o       atoteque        o         
SFX A o       atotene         o         
SFX A o       atoteve         o         
SFX A o       anto            o         
SFX A o       antoque         o         
SFX A o       antone          o         
SFX A o       antove          o         
SFX A o       are             o         
SFX A o       areque          o         
SFX A o       arene           o         
SFX A o       areve           o         
SFX A o       andum           o         
SFX A o       andumque        o         
SFX A o       andumne         o         
SFX A o       andumve         o         
SFX A o       andi            o         
SFX A o       andique         o         
SFX A o       andine          o         
SFX A o       andive          o         
SFX A o       ando            o         
SFX A o       andoque         o         
SFX A o       andone          o         
SFX A o       andove          o         
SFX A o       ans             o         
SFX A o       ansque          o         
SFX A o       ansne           o         
SFX A o       ansve           o         
SFX A o       antem           o         
SFX A o       antemque        o         
SFX A o       antemne         o         
SFX A o       antemve         o         
SFX A o       antis           o         
SFX A o       antisque        o         
SFX A o       antisne         o         
SFX A o       antisve         o         
SFX A o       anti            o         
SFX A o       antique         o         
SFX A o       antine          o         
SFX A o       antive          o         
SFX A o       ante            o         
SFX A o       anteque         o         
SFX A o       antene          o         
SFX A o       anteve          o         
SFX A o       antes           o         
SFX A o       antesque        o         
SFX A o       antesne         o         
SFX A o       antesve         o         
SFX A o       antium          o         
SFX A o       antiumque       o         
SFX A o       antiumne        o         
SFX A o       antiumve        o         
SFX A o       antibus         o         
SFX A o       antibusque      o         
SFX A o       antibusne       o         
SFX A o       antibusve       o         
SFX A o       antia           o         
SFX A o       antiaque        o         
SFX A o       antiane         o         
SFX A o       antiave         o         
SFX A o       or              o         
SFX A o       orque           o         
