extras/dictionaries/la.dic
abhortor/A
ablaqueo/APS
abnumero/A
absento/A
acceptito/AP
accorporo/A
acerbo/APS
adaequo/APS
adapto/APS
addecimo/A
adfecto/APS
adformido/AP
adglutino/APS
adinvestigo/APS
adiuvo/A
adlevio/APS
admeo/A
admodulo/A
adnihilo/AP
adolescentior/A
adparo/APS
adpretio/APS
adpugno/APS
adservo/APS
adsimilo/APS
adsummo/A
adtestor/A
adtumulo/APS
aduro/APS
adversor/A
aedifico/APS
aequedisto/A
aerugino/AP
aeterno/A
afflagro/APS
aggemino/APS
agguberno/A
alienigero/A
allaudo/A
alluctor/A
altero/A
amarifico/A
amicor/A
amplexo/A
amylo/APS
anculo/A
anilitor/A
annomino/AP
annuntio/APS
antiquo/APS
aperto/A
apostato/AP
apploro/AP
approno/A
apricor/A
architector/A
ariolor/A
articulo/APS
asculto/APS
assector/A
assiduo/APS
assolido/A
asto/A
attento/APS
attono/A
auctito/A
augmento/A
auroro/A
autumo/APS
avolo/APS
baiolo/APS
baptizio/APS
benefico/A
bombizo/A
cacabo/A
calcio/APS
camaro/APS
canto/APS
carino/APS
catillo/APS
celebro/APS
certo/APS
circito/AP
circumflagro/A
circumplico/APS
circumvagor/A
clarifico/A
clupeo/A
coaglo/APS
coeno/APS
coiro/AP
collimito/A
combino/APS
commastico/AS
commisero/A
commurmuror/A
complexor/A
concarno/A
conclamito/APS
concurso/APS
confarro/APS
confoedo/AP
conglacio/APS
conlacrimo/APS
conlumino/A
conmento/AP
conmoror/A
conpalpo/A
conposito/AP
conrivo/APS
conscreor/A
consolo/A
constricto/A
contemplor/A
contionor/A
conturmo/A
convibro/AP
coopto/APS
corresuscito/A
craxo/A
croco/A
cummino/A
damno/APS
debilito/APS
decito/A
deculto/A
defatiscor/A
defrico/A
degravo/APS
delacrimo/A
delicior/A
demando/APS
demurmuro/A
denuntio/APS
depilo/APS
depraedo/AP
deputo/APS
desivo/A
desubulo/APS
deturbo/APS
devoco/APS
diffulmino/A
diluculo/A
discobino/APS
dispenso/APS
dissigillo/A
distrunco/APS
divolgo/APS
doto/APS
ecfascino/A
ecfumigo/AS
effeto/A
effuso/A
elato/APS
elogio/APS
emano/APS
emundo/APS
eneco/A
enudo/APS
erro/APS
evagor/A
evoco/APS
exalbo/APS
exascio/APS
excavo/APS
excribello/A
exeredo/APS
exheredo/APS
exonero/APS
expecto/APS
expostulo/APS
exsecro/A
exspolio/APS
exsultor/A
extirpo/APS
exungulo/AP
faenero/APS
fatigo/APS
feneror/A
figuro/APS
flaxo/A
foecundo/APS
formido/APS
frenetizo/A
frutico/APS
furcillo/A
geniculo/A
glorior/A
gratulor/A
habito/APS
helleboro/A
holero/A
humido/A
ieiuno/A
illigo/APS
imbulbito/A
impenso/A
impraegno/APS
inalto/APS
incandido/A
incilo/A
incrasso/APS
incurvo/APS
indusio/A
infibulo/A
infusco/APS
inhortor/A
inlatro/A
inmigro/APS
inodoro/A
inplicito/A
inquieto/APS
insecto/A
inspico/A
insuco/APS
intercalo/APS
intermico/A
interrogo/APS
intitulo/AP
inverso/A
ioco/APS
itito/APS
iuvenor/A
laetifico/APS
lapso/APS
laxo/APS
levo/APS
litigo/APS
lubrico/APS
lurco/A
maculo/APS
manduco/APS
mastico/APS
mercor/A
minio/APS
mitifico/APS
monstro/APS
musinor/A
musico/AS
naufrago/AP
nictor/A
noto/APS
nuto/APS
obcupo/APS
obiurigo/APS
obnuntio/APS
obsibilo/A
obstrigillo/A
obvelo/A
occulco/APS
olimo/A
opitulor/A
opturo/APS
ovico/A
palpito/APS
participo/APS
pavido/A
pensiculo/APS
percolo/APS
perdomo/A
perfrequento/A
perlumino/A
pernumero/APS
persano/APS
perstipo/APS
pervaporo/A
phrenitizo/A
pipilo/A
plausito/A
populo/APS
praecanto/APS
praedemno/APS
praeformo/APS
praelevo/A
praemior/A
praepalpo/A
praeservo/APS
praestrangulo/A
praetrepido/A
prehenso/APS
procuro/APS
proiacto/APS
pronomino/A
propitio/APS
prostro/A
psalmizo/A
pumico/APS
quadruplor/A
quirito/APS
ratiocinor/A
recipero/APS
reconsigno/A
redadopto/AP
redorno/APS
reformido/APS
regulo/APS
reloco/APS
remulco/A
renuto/A
repraesento/APS
resano/APS
responso/A
retempero/A
revoco/APS
robigino/A
rumifico/A
sabatizo/A
saluto/APS
satisdato/A
scirpo/APS
secto/AP
sentifico/A
sicco/APS
sincero/AP
somnio/APS
spiro/APS
statumino/A
strenuo/A
subbaiulo/A
subflammo/A
subinvito/APS
submurmuro/AP
subpuro/APS
substomachor/A
succido/A
suffragor/A
summuto/A
superdeligo/A
superiacto/APS
superordino/A
suppalpor/A
surculo/A
sycophantor/A
tenebrico/AP
testiculor/A
tibizo/A
torno/APS
transfluvio/A
transporto/APS
tricor/A
trucido/APS
tumulo/APS
udo/AP
urco/A
vagor/A
vegeto/APS
ventrigo/A
verso/APS
vibro/APS
vindico/APS
vivifico/APS
vulgo/APS
